apertium-rus-ukr.ukr.dix
<pardef n="несподіван/ка__n_f_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>ка</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кою</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ко</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ок</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кам</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ках</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ками</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="меценат__n_m_aa">
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="металургі/я__n_f_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>є</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ям</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ях</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ями</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="менеджер__n_m_aa">
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="мар/ка__n_f_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>ка</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кою</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ко</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ок</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кам</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ках</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ками</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="несподіванка"><i>несподіван</i><par n="несподіван/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="меценат"><i>меценат</i><par n="меценат__n_m_aa"/></e>
<e lm="металургія"><i>металургі</i><par n="металургі/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="менеджер"><i>менеджер</i><par n="менеджер__n_m_aa"/></e>
<e lm="марка"><i>мар</i><par n="мар/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
